Missouri, session 2026, SB1001.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 442, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 442.703, to read as
follows:
442.703. 1. (1) This section shall be known and may
be cited as the "American Dream Act".
(2) The general assembly finds that excessive
institutional ownership of single-family homes contributes
to housing scarcity, inflates prices, and denies young
families access to homeownership.
(3) Young families are increasingly priced out of the
housing market, creating barriers to entry for first-time
homebuyers and discouraging Missourians from raising
families in our state.
(4) It is unhealthy for entire generations of young
people to be unable to own property. Individuals who own
homes have greater stability, stronger community ties, and a
deeper sense of civic responsibility.
(5) Homeownership is an integral part of the American
dream. In light of this fact, it is incumbent upon this
general assembly to preserve and protect the American way of
life for generations of Americans to come. This can be
accomplished by setting reasonable regulations pertaining to
the institutional ownership of residential real estate.


These regulations should prevent market concentration by
institutional investors, since such concentration undermines
the long-term stability of our communities.
2. For purposes of this section, the following terms
mean:
(1) "Commission", the Missouri housing development
commission, established pursuant to section 215.020;
(2) "Institutional buyer", any corporation,
partnership, limited liability company, real estate
investment trust, private equity firm, hedge fund, or
similar business entity, including any subsidiary or
affiliate thereof, that collectively owns more than fifty
single-family residential properties within the United
States, and is engaged in the business of acquiring such
properties for investment or profit through rental or
resale, provided that the term institutional buyer shall not
include any home builder; residential land developer; land
bank entity; investment entity or financing entity providing
land banking, investment, or financing to a home builder or
residential land developer and that is affiliated with a
home builder or residential land developer; not-for-profit
corporation; or public housing agency;
(3) "Investment entity", an entity that manages funds
pooled from twenty-five or less investors. Two or more
investment entities under common management shall be
aggregated and treated as one for purposes of this
definition;
(4) "Single-family residential property", real
property improved with one dwelling unit intended for
occupancy by one family, including detached homes, but shall
not include:


(a) Any residential structure situated on a single
legal lot on which multiple residential structures are
situated; or
(b) Two or more contiguous residential structures in a
community of twenty or more units in which residential
rental occupancy is allowed.
3. An institutional buyer shall not acquire a single-
family residential property in this state unless such single-
family residential property has been publicly listed for
sale for more than ninety days and is not during such time
subject to a binding sales agreement.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(1) Prohibit, restrict, or interfere with any bank,
credit union, land bank or investor for a home builder,
mortgage lender, or other financial institution from
offering, issuing, or servicing loans or mortgages for the
acquisition, financing, or land banking or refinancing of
single-family residential property;
(2) Affect the rights, obligations, or activities of
such financial institutions under state or federal law;
(3) Apply to any person or entity which is not an
institutional buyer; or
(4) Apply to any entity acquiring a single-family
residential property built and permitted as a rental
community.
5. The commission may promulgate rules necessary to
implement and enforce this act, with respect to the
responsibilities granted to them, respectively, pursuant to
this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term
is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section


536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
Section B. If any provision of section A of this act
or the application thereof to anyone or to any circumstance
is held invalid, the remainder of those sections and the
application of such provisions to others or other
circumstances shall not be affected thereby.